Mississippi, session 2026, SB2125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  A person operating a motor vehicle on a public road, street or highway of the State of Mississippi shall be strictly liable for damages caused in an accident if the operator is found failing to have the minimum amounts of motor vehicle liability insurance required by Chapter 15 of Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, when the accident occurred. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.